Maryland, session 2026, SB0201.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Utilities
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0201*

SENATE BILL 201
7–207.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “ADVANCED TRANSMISSION TECHNOLOGIES” MEANS:
(I) GRID–ENHANCING TECHNOLOGIES;
(II) HIGH PERFORMANCE CONDUCTORS; OR
(III) ENERGY STORAGE USED AS TRANSMISSION.
(3) “Brownfields site” means:
(i) a former industrial or commercial site identified by federal or
State laws or regulation as contaminated or polluted;
(ii) a closed landfill regulated by the Department of the
Environment; or
(iii) mined land.
[(3)] (4) (i) “Construction” means:
1. any physical change at a site, including fabrication,
erection, installation, or demolition; or
2. the entry into a binding agreement or contractual
obligation to purchase equipment exclusively for use in construction in the State or to
undertake a program of actual construction in the State which cannot be canceled or
modified without substantial loss to the owner or operator of the proposed generating
station.
(ii) “Construction” does not include a change that is needed for the
temporary use of a site or route for nonutility purposes or for use in securing geological
data, including any boring that is necessary to ascertain foundation conditions.
[(4)] (5) “Generating station” does not include:
(i) a generating unit or facility that:
1. is used for the production of electricity;
2. has the capacity to produce not more than 2 megawatts of
alternating current; and

SENATE BILL 201 3
3. is installed with equipment that prevents the flow of
electricity to the electric grid during time periods when the electric grid is out of service;
(ii) a combination of two or more generating units or facilities that:
1. are used for the production of electricity from a solar
photovoltaic system or an eligible customer–generator that is subject to the provisions of §
7–306 of this title;
2. are located on the same property or adjacent properties;
3. have the capacity to produce, when calculated
cumulatively for all generating units or facilities on the property or adjacent property, more
than 2 megawatts but not more than 14 megawatts of alternating current; and
4. for each individual generating unit or facility:
A. has the capacity to produce not more than 2 megawatts of
alternating current;
B. is separately metered by the electric company; and
C. does not export electricity for sale on the wholesale market
under an agreement with PJM Interconnection, LLC;
(iii) a generating unit or facility that:
1. is used for the production of electricity for the purpose of:
A. onsite emergency backup at a facility when service from
the electric company is interrupted due to electric distribution or transmission system
failure or when there is equipment failure at a site where critical infrastructure is located;
and
B. test and maintenance operations necessary to ensure
functionality of the generating unit or facility in the event of a service interruption from
the electric company due to electric distribution or transmission system failure or when
there is equipment failure at a site where critical infrastructure is located;
2. is installed with equipment that prevents the flow of
electricity to the electric grid;
3. is subject to a permit to construct issued by the
Department of the Environment; and

SENATE BILL 201
4. is installed at a facility that is part of critical
infrastructure if the facility complies with all applicable regulations regarding noise level
and testing hours; or
(iv) a combination of two or more generating units or facilities that
satisfy item (iii) of this paragraph.
[(5)] (6) (I) “GRID–ENHANCING TECHNOLOGY” MEANS
HARDWARE OR SOFTWARE THAT INCREASES THE CAPACITY, EFFICIENCY, OR
RELIABILITY OF EXISTING TRANSMISSION SYSTEMS.
(II) “GRID–ENHANCING TECHNOLOGY” INCLUDES:
1. A SYSTEM THAT USES REAL–TIME OR FORECASTED
WEATHER AND OPERATING CONDITIONS TO DETERMINE THE TRANSFER CAPACITY
OF TRANSMISSION SYSTEMS;
2. TECHNOLOGY THAT MODULATES CIRCUIT
IMPEDANCE OR OTHER ELECTRICAL PROPERTIES TO REROUTE POWER FLOWS AND
RELIEVE CONGESTION; AND
3. SOFTWARE THAT IDENTIFIES SWITCHING
CONFIGURATIONS TO REROUTE ELECTRICITY AND ALLEVIATE TRANSMISSION
CONSTRAINTS.
(7) “HIGH PERFORMANCE CONDUCTORS” MEANS CONDUCTORS,
INCLUDING CARBON FIBER CONDUCTORS, COMPOSITE CORE CONDUCTORS, OR
SUPERCONDUCTORS, THAT:
(I) HAVE A SIMILAR DIAMETER AND WEIGHT AS TRADITIONAL
ACSR CONDUCTORS;
(II) HAVE A DIRECT CURRENT ELECTRICAL RESISTANCE AT
LEAST 10% LESS THAN TRADITIONAL ACSR CONDUCTORS;
(III) INCREASE THE POTENTIAL ENERGY CARRYING CAPACITY
BY AT LEAST 75% COMPARED TO TRADITIONAL ACSR CONDUCTORS; AND
(IV) HAVE A COEFFICIENT OF THERMAL EXPANSION OF AT LEAST
30% LESS THAN TRADITIONAL ACSR CONDUCTORS.
(8) (i) “Mined land” means the surface or subsurface of an area in which
surface mining operations will be, are being, or have been conducted.

SENATE BILL 201 5
(ii) “Mined land” includes:
1. private ways and roads used for mining appurtenant to
any surface mining area;
2. land excavations;
3. workings; and
4. overburden.
[(6)] (9) “Qualified generator lead line” means an overhead transmission
line [that is] AND ANY ASSOCIATED ADVANCED TRANSMISSION TECHNOLOGY designed
to carry, OR SUPPORT THE CARRYING OF, a voltage in excess of 69,000 volts and would
allow an out–of–state Tier 1 or Tier 2 renewable source to interconnect with a portion of
the electric system in Maryland that is owned by an electric company.
(10) “TRADITIONAL ACSR CONDUCTORS” MEANS ELECTRICAL
CABLES USED IN OVERHEAD TRANSMISSION SYSTEMS THAT CONSIST OF A CENTRAL
CORE OF GALVANIZED STEEL WIRES SURROUNDED BY STRANDS OF ALUMINUM.
(b) (3) (i) Except as provided in paragraph (4) of this subsection, unless a
certificate of public convenience and necessity for the construction is first obtained from the
Commission, a person may not begin construction of an overhead transmission line that is
designed to carry a voltage in excess of 69,000 volts or exercise a right of condemnation
with the construction.
(ii) For construction related to an existing overhead transmission
line, the Commission may waive the requirement in subparagraph (i) of this paragraph for
good cause.
(iii) Notwithstanding subparagraph (i) of this paragraph and subject
to subparagraph [(iv)] (V) of this paragraph, the Commission may issue a certificate of
public convenience and necessity for the construction of an overhead transmission line only
if the applicant for the certificate of public convenience and necessity:
1. is an electric company; or
2. is or, on the start of commercial operation of the overhead
transmission line, will be subject to regulation as a public utility by an officer or an agency
of the United States.
(iv) AN APPLICANT FOR A CERTIFICATE OF PUBLIC
CONVENIENCE AND NECESSITY FOR THE CONSTRUCTION OF AN OVERHEAD
TRANSMISSION LINE SHALL INCLUDE IN ITS APPLICATION:

SENATE BILL 201
1. EVIDENCE THAT THE APPLICANT CONSIDERED, AS
PART OF THE APPLICANT’S INTERNAL PLANNING PROCESS, ANY LOCAL, STATE, OR
FEDERAL GOVERNMENT TRANSMISSION PLANNING PROCESSES AND ANY
TRANSMISSION PLANNING PROCESSES REQUIRED BY PJM INTERCONNECTION,
LLC, INCLUDING:
A. ALTERNATIVES TO THE PROPOSED TRANSMISSION
LINE;
B. AN ANALYSIS OF ADVANCED TRANSMISSION
TECHNOLOGIES AND WHETHER THE USE OF THE TECHNOLOGIES WILL ENHANCE
THE VALUE OF THE NEW LEAD LINE, LEADING TO INCREASED RATEPAYER VALUE
THROUGH EFFICIENCY AND AVOIDED COSTS;
C. ALTERNATIVE ROUTINGS;
D. TECHNOLOGIES OR MODIFICATIONS TO ONE OR MORE
ELECTRIC DISTRIBUTION SYSTEMS IN THE STATE THAT COULD AVOID THE NEED
FOR THE TRANSMISSION LINE;
E. THE COST TO RATEPAYERS;
F. RESOURCE ADEQUACY;
G. ENERGY EFFICIENCY AND DEMAND RESPONSE;
H. THE IMPACT OF THE PROJECT ON THE ENVIRONMENT;
I. A REVIEW OF AN INTEGRATED ELECTRIC
TRANSMISSION–DISTRIBUTION SYSTEM TO ADDRESS THE NEED FOR THE
TRANSMISSION LINE; AND
J. ANY OTHER INFORMATION THE COMMISSION
CONSIDERS APPROPRIATE; AND
2. AN ANALYSIS OF THE TRANSMISSION LINE ROUTE
SELECTION, INCLUDING:
A. RISKS ASSOCIATED WITH THE COSTS ESTIMATES;
B. COST CONTAINMENT EFFORTS;
C. CONSTRUCTION SCHEDULE;

SENATE BILL 201 7
D. ACQUISITION OF LAND AND RIGHTS–OF–WAY;
E. OUTAGE COORDINATION; AND
F. THE APPLICANT’S EXPERIENCE WORKING WITH
COMMUNITIES AND STAKEHOLDERS ON ROUTE CONSIDERATION.
(V) The Commission may not issue a certificate of public
convenience and necessity for the construction of an overhead transmission line in the
electric distribution service territory of an electric company to an applicant other than an
electric company if:
1. the overhead transmission line is to be located solely
within the electric distribution service territory of that electric company; and
2. the cost of the overhead transmission line is to be paid
solely by that electric company and its ratepayers.
[(v)] (VI) 1. This subparagraph applies to the construction of an
overhead transmission line for which a certificate of public convenience and necessity is
required under this section.
2. On issuance of a certificate of public convenience and
necessity for the construction of an overhead transmission line, a person may acquire by
condemnation, in accordance with Title 12 of the Real Property Article, any property or
right necessary for the construction or maintenance of the transmission line.
(f) For the construction of an overhead transmission line, in addition to the
considerations listed in subsection (e) of this section, the Commission shall:
(1) take final action on an application for a certificate of public convenience
and necessity only after due consideration of:
(i) the need to meet existing and future demand for electric service;
[and]
(ii) EVIDENCE THAT ALTERNATIVES HAVE BEEN CONSIDERED
BY THE APPLICANT IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (B)(3)(IV) OF THIS SECTION;
AND
(III) for construction related to a new overhead transmission line, the
alternative routes that the applicant considered, including the estimated capital and
operating costs of each alternative route and a statement of the reason why the alternative
route was rejected;

SENATE BILL 201
7–207.6.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “ADVANCED TRANSMISSION TECHNOLOGIES” HAS
THE MEANING STATED IN § 7–207 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, ON OR
BEFORE DECEMBER 1, 2026, AND EVERY 4 YEARS THEREAFTER, EACH OWNER OR
OPERATOR OF AN OVERHEAD TRANSMISSION LINE SHALL SUBMIT TO THE
COMMISSION A REPORT THAT:
(I) IDENTIFIES AREAS OF TRANSMISSION CONGESTION FOR
THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING 3 YEARS AND ANY REASONABLY FORESEEABLE
TRANSMISSION CONGESTION ISSUES FOR THE 5 YEARS IMMEDIATELY FOLLOWING
THE DATE OF THE REPORT;
(II) IDENTIFIES THE PROJECTED OR ACTUAL COST TO
RATEPAYERS AS A RESULT OF PAST AND PROJECTED FUTURE TRANSMISSION
CONGESTION;
(III) IDENTIFIES THE FEASIBILITY AND COST OF USING
ALTERNATIVE MEANS OF ADDRESSING TRANSMISSION CONGESTION, INCLUDING
THE USE OF ADVANCED TRANSMISSION TECHNOLOGIES;
(IV) IDENTIFIES THE ECONOMIC, ENVIRONMENTAL, AND SOCIAL
ISSUES POSED BY THE USE OF EACH ALTERNATIVE MEANS IDENTIFIED UNDER ITEM
(III) OF THIS PARAGRAPH; AND
(V) IF FEASIBLE, PROPOSES AN ADVANCED TRANSMISSION
TECHNOLOGY IMPLEMENTATION PLAN TO ADDRESS AREAS OF TRANSMISSION
CONGESTION IDENTIFIED UNDER ITEM (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH.
(2) THE COMMISSION MAY MODIFY THE REPORTING SCHEDULE
SPECIFIED IN PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(C) AN OWNER OR OPERATOR OF AN OVERHEAD TRANSMISSION LINE MAY
USE ANY AVAILABLE DATA FROM PJM INTERCONNECTION, LLC, OR OTHER
SOURCES IN COMPLETING THE REPORT REQUIRED UNDER THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.